California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
If identification cards are issued by the department on a pilot project or statewide basis, the department shall notify providers that current Medi-Cal beneficiaries have been issued
 identification cards in accordance with Section 14017. At that time, it shall be the responsibility of the provider prior to rendering nonemergency Medi-Cal reimbursable services to persons presenting themselves as Medi-Cal beneficiaries to verify the person’s identity by matching the name and signature on their identification card issued by the department or their valid California driver’s license or California identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, against a signature executed at the time of service and further by visually verifying their likeness to the photograph on the identification card or driver’s license. If the provider complies in good faith, he or she shall not be held responsible by having payments withheld by the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1014, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.6.

For the purposes of this chapter, all references to “the Medi-Cal card,” identified in Section 14017.8, shall be deemed to also be a reference to the benefits identification card, identified in Section 14017.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 171, Sec. 36.   Effective August 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.7.

(a) In addition to the issuance of Medi-Cal cards, pursuant to Section 14017.8, the department may issue a benefits identification card for the purpose of identifying an individual who has been determined eligible for health care benefits under this chapter or health care benefits under another health care program administered by the department, including, but not limited to, the Medi-Cal Access Program as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3, or both.

(b) The department may also issue a benefits identification card for the purpose of identifying an individual who has been determined eligible to receive health care services from a Medi-Cal provider under
 the Healthy Families Program under Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, if children are enrolled back into that program pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 14005.26 or subdivision (q) of Section 14005.27.

(c) In no event shall a benefits identification card be issued to an individual described in subdivision (a) or (b) unless appropriate and adequate safeguards have been implemented to ensure all of the following:

(1) If the individual has been determined eligible for health care benefits under another health care program administered by the department or a program identified in subdivision (b), that health care program pays for any and all health care benefits delivered to the individual by that health care program.

(2) State funds appropriated to or federal Medicaid financial participation claimed by the Medi-Cal program shall only be used for the delivery of health care benefits authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The individual described in subdivision (a) or (b) may present the benefits identification card to obtain health care benefits for which that individual has been determined eligible under this chapter, or health care benefits under another health care program administered by the department or a program identified in subdivision (b), or all of them.

(e) Where applicable, all laws, regulations, restrictions, conditions, and terms of participation regarding the possession, billing, and use of Medi-Cal cards shall
 also apply to a benefits identification card.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “benefits” includes medically
 necessary services, goods, supplies, or merchandise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.8.

Each person eligible under Section 14005.1 and each person eligible under Section 14005.4 or 14005.7 who is certified eligible shall be provided, by the department, with a Medi-Cal card certifying his or her status, identification number, expiration date and his or her entitlements, insofar as these do not require specific prior authorization. The department shall determine the form of the Medi-Cal card. The cards shall be for a term as determined by the department and, unless canceled for cause, shall entitle individuals to care and service as indicated. Cause for cancellation shall exist when the person dies, loses state residence, is found to be
 ineligible, or has been issued a new Medi-Cal card.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1354, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

14018.

(a) (1) The Medi-Cal card shall be authorization for payment for health care services rendered, during and subsequent to the month of application of a person eligible under Section 14005.1, or a person eligible under Section 14005.4 or 14005.7 who is certified by the department.

(2) The Medi-Cal card shall be signed and dated in the space provided on the card by the beneficiary upon receipt of the card and prior to presentation of the card for any service.
 This paragraph shall not apply to either of the following:

 (A) Persons 17 years of age and under.

 (B) Persons in long-term care.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person with a Medi-Cal card who receives medical assistance for home and facility care may be ineligible for payment for periods of time, including partial months of ineligibility, as determined pursuant to Section 14015 and in accordance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(c) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is
 available.

(d) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 379, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14018.1.

The department shall prospectively notify a Medi-Cal managed care plan of the date of the regularly scheduled annual redetermination of a Medi-Cal beneficiary in a disabled aid category, who is enrolled in that plan and where eligibility redetermination is the responsibility of the department. Nothing in this section shall provide a beneficiary with additional Medi-Cal coverage due to the department’s failure to provide this notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14018.2.

(a) Reimbursement shall not be denied to any qualified health care provider for care rendered to an eligible Medi-Cal beneficiary for the sole reason that a proof of eligibility label does not accompany the bill.

Proof of eligibility labels may, however, continue to be used as such and shall be made available to an eligible Medi-Cal beneficiary through the local
 office which has determined the person’s eligibility or through the department. The provider may submit machine-reproduced copies of the beneficiary Medi-Cal card for billing purposes as long as the copy is made from the original unaltered Medi-Cal card under circumstances controlled by the provider, for example, on the premises of the provider with copying equipment controlled by the provider.

(b) It shall remain the responsibility of a Medi-Cal beneficiary to provide information and evidence of Medi-Cal eligibility, restrictions on the eligibility, and non-Medi-Cal health coverage, to that person’s health care providers, if this information is requested by those providers prior to rendering services to that beneficiary.

(c) It shall be the responsibility of the provider prior to rendering Medi-Cal reimbursable services to persons presenting themselves as Medi-Cal beneficiaries
 to make a good faith effort to verify the person’s identity, if the person is not known to the provider, by matching the name and signature on his or her Medi-Cal card against the signature on a valid California driver’s license, or California identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, or another type of picture identification card or other credible document of identification. When the provider verifies the beneficiary’s identity with a signed Medi-Cal card and one of the documents described above, the state will deem this to be a good faith effort. If the provider does not make a good faith effort of reasonable identification prior to rendering Medi-Cal reimbursable services and renders services to a presenting person who is ineligible for those Medi-Cal services, payment for those services may later be disallowed.

This provision shall not apply to:

(1) Persons 17 years of age and
 under.

(2) Persons in long-term care.

(3) Persons receiving emergency services.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of this section, county welfare departments may provide Medi-Cal eligibility information to other governmental agencies and their designated agents as necessary for proper administration of the Medi-Cal program.

(e) If a hospital obtains proof of Medi-Cal eligibility for a patient subsequent to the date of service, it shall be the responsibility of the hospital to provide all information regarding that person’s Medi-Cal eligibility to all hospital-based providers, ambulance transportation services providers, providers that provide ambulance transportation services through the “911” emergency response system, and other hospital-based
 providers of professional services that bill separately for all services associated with the person’s treatment in the hospital rendered during the same time period for which the hospital is submitting a claim. The hospital may inform the provider that the person’s Medi-Cal eligibility is pending, before a final determination is made on the patient’s Medi-Cal application, to satisfy the requirements of this subdivision. If the provider or the provider’s agent obtains this information from the hospital, the requirement has been satisfied.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Hospital-based provider” means an anesthesiologist, radiologist, pathologist, emergency room physician, or other physician or a group of physicians providing medical services at the hospital.

(2) “Hospital-based
 professional services” means services performed for a patient while at a hospital, related to the patient’s hospital stay, and known to the hospital, including, but not limited to, diagnostic, laboratory, therapeutic, and radiologic services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 511, Sec. 1.   (AB 1142)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14018.4.

(a) Reimbursement shall not be denied to any hospital, licensed primary care clinic, or long-term health care facility as defined in Section 1326 of the Health and Safety Code for care rendered to an eligible Medi-Cal beneficiary for the sole reason that a proof of eligibility label does not accompany the bill, so long as the claim includes other appropriate documentation of eligibility.

(b) The director shall require county welfare departments to issue, upon the request of a hospital, licensed primary care clinic, or long-term health care facility as defined in Section 1326 of the Health and Safety Code providing care to an eligible Medi-Cal beneficiary, replacement Medi-Cal proof of eligibility labels or other appropriate documentation of eligibility to the requester, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The hospital, licensed primary care clinic, or long-term health care facility as defined in Section 1326 of the Health and Safety Code attempted to obtain a label from the beneficiary at the time the service was provided.

(2) The hospital, licensed primary care clinic, or long-term health care facility as defined in Section 1326 of the Health and Safety Code made a subsequent attempt to
 obtain a label or other appropriate documentation from the beneficiary.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the director shall require that the replacement proof of eligibility label or other appropriate documentation of eligibility provided pursuant to subdivision (b) accompany the bill of the hospital, the licensed primary care clinic, or the long-term health care facility as defined in Section 1326 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until both the Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the Assembly have received certification by registered mail from the Director of Health Services, that the automated eligibility verification system required by Section 14042 is operative for all counties and has been demonstrated to be accurate for each county at the 97-percent level as required by Section 14042 and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1161, Sec. 3.   Repealed as of date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14018.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Section 3275 of the Civil Code does not apply to Medi-Cal reimbursement or prior authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 36.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14018.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, neither a member of the governing body of the commission nor a member of any advisory panel to the governing body shall be deemed to be interested in a contract entered into by the commission within the meaning of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code if all of the following apply:

(1) The board of supervisors or the governing body appointed the individual to
 represent the interests of physicians, health care practitioners, hospitals, pharmacies, or other health care organizations.

(2) The contract authorizes the individual or the organization the individual represents to provide services under the local initiative.

(3) The contract contains substantially the same terms and conditions as contracts entered into with other individuals or organizations that the individual was appointed to represent.

(4) The individual does not influence or attempt to influence any advisory panel, the governing body, or any member of the governing body to enter into the contract.

(5) The individual discloses the interest to the governing body and the advisory panel, if applicable, and abstains from voting on the contract.

(6) The governing body and the advisory panel, if applicable, notes the disclosure and abstention in its official records and authorizes the contract in good faith by a vote of its membership sufficient for that purpose without counting the vote of the individual.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “commission” means a nonprofit corporation established in Kern County to operate the local health plan and other health care programs owned by, or operated in, Kern County.

(2) The commission shall be considered a public entity for purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, “governing body” means the board of directors of the nonprofit corporation
 established in Kern County, and “board of supervisors” means the Kern County Board of Supervisors.

(d) The commission may enter into agreements under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 10.3.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14019.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 14018, except as provided in Section 14019.6, Medi-Cal eligibility
 shall be authorization for payment for health care services rendered, under conditions prescribed by the director and to the extent required by federal law, during any of the three months immediately prior to the month in which application was made, and for which such person would have otherwise been eligible.

(2) For an application made on or after the first day of the first quarter that begins after December 31, 2026, by an applicant described in Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or by an applicant for state-funded Medi-Cal coverage who meets the same criteria described in that federal provision, Medi-Cal eligibility shall be authorization for payment for health care services rendered, under conditions prescribed by the director and to the extent required by federal law during the month immediately prior to
 the month the application was made, and for which that person would have otherwise been eligible, notwithstanding Section 14018.

(3) For an application made on or after the first day of the first quarter that begins after December 31, 2026, by any applicant except those described in paragraph (2), Medi-Cal eligibility shall be authorization for payment for health care services rendered, under conditions prescribed by the director and to the extent required by federal law during either of the two months immediately prior to the month the application was made, and for which that person would have otherwise been eligible, notwithstanding Section 14018.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or
 county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(c) (1) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) shall be implemented only after the director determines, and communicates in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation of this section.

(2) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 81.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14019.3.

(a) A beneficiary or any person on behalf of a beneficiary who has paid for medically necessary health care services, otherwise covered by the Medi-Cal program, received by the beneficiary shall be entitled to a return from a provider or directly from the department of any part of the payment that meets all of the following:

(1) Was rendered during the 90-day period prior to application for, his or her Medi-Cal card, or after application for but prior to the issuance of, his
 or her Medi-Cal card, for which the card authorizes payment under Section 14018 or 14019, or was charged to the beneficiary as excess copayment during the period after issuance of his or her Medi-Cal card.

(2) Is not payable by a third party under contractual or other legal entitlement.

(3) Was not used to satisfy his or her paid or obligated liability for health care services or to establish eligibility.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, whether or not a facility actually evicts a beneficiary, a beneficiary who may validly be evicted pursuant to Section 1439.7 of the Health and Safety Code, and who has received and paid for health care services otherwise covered by the Medi-Cal program shall not be entitled to the return from a provider of any part of the payment for which service was rendered during any
 period prior to the date upon which knowledge is acquired by a provider of the application of a beneficiary for Medi-Cal or the date of application for Medi-Cal, whichever is later.

(c) Upon presentation of the Medi-Cal card or other proof of eligibility, a provider shall submit a Medi-Cal claim for reimbursement, subject to the rules and regulations of the Medi-Cal program.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), payment received from the state in accordance with Medi-Cal fee structures shall constitute payment in full, except that a provider, after making a full refund to the department of any Medi-Cal payments received for services, may recover all provider fees to the extent that any other contractual entitlement, including, but not limited to, a private group or indemnification insurance program, is obligated to pay the charges for the care provided a beneficiary.

(e) A provider shall return any and all payments made by a beneficiary, or any person on behalf of a beneficiary, other than a third party obligated to pay charges by reason of a beneficiary’s other contractual or legal entitlement for Medi-Cal program covered services upon receipt of Medi-Cal payment.

(f) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department shall waive overpayments made to a pharmacy provider that would otherwise be reimbursable to the department for prescription drugs returned to a pharmacy provider from a nursing facility upon discontinuation of the drug therapy or death of a beneficiary.

(g) The department shall ensure payment to a beneficiary from a provider. A provider shall be notified in writing by the department when a beneficiary has submitted a claim to the department for reimbursement of
 services provided during the periods specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). If a provider is not currently enrolled in the Medi-Cal program, the department shall assist in that enrollment. Enrollment in the Medi-Cal program may be made retroactive to the date the service was rendered.

(h) If a provider fails or refuses to reimburse a beneficiary for services provided during the periods specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), within 90 days of receipt by the department of a written request by a beneficiary or a representative of a beneficiary, the department may take enforcement action that may include, but shall not be limited to, any or all of the following:

(1) Withholding of future provider payments.

(2) Suspension of a provider from participation in the Medi-Cal program.

(3) Recoupment of funds from a provider.

(i) If a provider fails or refuses to reimburse a beneficiary within 90 days after receipt by the department of a written request from a beneficiary or a representative of a beneficiary, the department shall directly reimburse a beneficiary for medically necessary health care expenses incurred during the periods specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The department shall reimburse a beneficiary only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and only when the claim meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The service was a covered benefit under the Medi-Cal program.

(2) The provider was an enrolled Medi-Cal provider at the time the service was rendered.

(3) The service was ordered by a health care provider, within the scope of his or her practice.

(4) The beneficiary is eligible for reimbursement, as specified in subdivision (a).

(5) The reimbursement shall be the amount paid by the beneficiary, not to exceed the rate established for that service under the Medi-Cal program.

(j) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code, this section may be implemented with a provider bulletin or similar notification, without any further regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 58.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14019.4.

(a) A provider of health care services who obtains a label or copy from the Medi-Cal card or other proof of eligibility pursuant to this chapter shall not seek reimbursement nor attempt to obtain payment for the cost of those covered health care services from the eligible applicant or recipient, or a person other than the department or a third-party payor who provides a contractual or legal entitlement to health care services.

(b) Whenever a service or set of services rendered to a Medi-Cal beneficiary results in the submission of a claim in excess of five hundred dollars ($500), and the beneficiary has given the provider proof of eligibility to receive the service or services, the provider shall issue the beneficiary a receipt to document that appropriate
 proof of eligibility has been provided. The form and content of those receipts shall be determined by the provider but shall be sufficient to comply with the intent of this subdivision. Nursing facilities and all categories of intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled are exempt from the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) In addition to being subject to applicable sanctions set forth in law or regulation, a provider of health care services who obtains a label from, or copy of, the Medi-Cal card or other proof of eligibility pursuant to this chapter, and who subsequently pursues reimbursement or payment for the cost of covered services from the beneficiary or fails to cease collection efforts against the beneficiary for covered services as required by subdivision (d), may be subject to a penalty, payable to the department, not to exceed three times the amount payable by the Medi-Cal program. In implementing this
 subdivision, mitigating circumstances, which include, but are not limited to, clerical error and good faith mistake, shall be considered when assessing the penalty. Providers subject to penalties under this subdivision shall have the right to appeal the assessed penalty, consistent with department procedures.

(d) When a Medi-Cal provider receives proof of a patient’s Medi-Cal eligibility and that provider has previously referred an unpaid bill for services rendered to the patient to a debt collector, the Medi-Cal provider shall promptly notify the debt collector of the patient’s Medi-Cal coverage, instruct the debt collector to cease collection efforts on the unpaid bill for the covered services, and notify the patient accordingly.

(e) If a patient provides proof of Medi-Cal eligibility to a debt collector, and the debt collector fails to notify the provider of this proof, the
 provider shall not be responsible for ensuring that collection efforts against the patient cease pursuant to subdivision (d) until either the patient or the debt collector provides the provider with proof of the patient’s Medi-Cal eligibility.

(f) A Medi-Cal provider or debt collector shall be deemed to be in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 1785.25 of the Civil Code if more than 30 days after receiving proof of Medi-Cal coverage the provider or debt collector does either of the following:

(1) Furnishes information regarding the rendering of the Medi-Cal covered services to a consumer credit reporting agency.

(2) Fails to provide corrections of, or instructions to delete, as appropriate, information regarding Medi-Cal covered services previously furnished by that Medi-Cal provider or debt collector to a
 consumer reporting agency.

(g) This section shall not apply to the Medi-Cal spend down of excess income owed by a Medi-Cal beneficiary, unless the beneficiary’s spend down of excess income has been met for the month in which services were rendered.

(h) For purposes of this section, “debt collector” includes any person who regularly engages in debt collection, as defined by Section 1788.2 of the Civil Code, but does not include the original Medi-Cal
 provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 118.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14019.5.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as imposing any control over the management of any medical or health care facility, except that each such facility shall be required to comply with reasonable standards for certification to participate in the program provided by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 577.)
-------------------------------------------

14019.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person, whose property reserve exceeds the property limit, may establish eligibility for the applicable retroactive eligibility period described in Section 14019, by spenddown of such excess property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 82.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14019.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14019.4 and if permitted by federal law, a relative of a skilled nursing facility resident who is a beneficiary under this chapter may pay an additional amount to the facility to enable the resident to obtain requested noncovered services, such as a private room, telephone, or television, or for bed hold days that exceed a period paid for under the state plan.

(b) The additional charge for requested noncovered services shall not exceed the amount
 charged to private pay residents. The additional charge for bed hold days shall not exceed the rate paid for by the Medi-Cal program for a covered bed hold day. The additional charge for a private room shall not exceed the difference between the private pay rate for a semiprivate room and a private room.

(c) Prior to accepting supplemental payment for holding a bed for a resident in a facility, a facility shall disclose to the relative the resident’s right under federal law to be readmitted without charge upon the first availability of a bed in a semiprivate room in that facility, other state and federal laws regarding bed hold rights, the average number of bed vacancies at that facility for the past month, and the current number of bed vacancies. Written information regarding bed vacancies shall be provided to the relative at the first available opportunity.

(d) The ability of a
 resident’s relative to pay an additional amount for noncovered services shall not be a condition of admission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 661, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14020.

All sections of this chapter shall remain in operation during such times as grants-in-aid are provided or made available to the state on the basis of a state plan approved by the federal government for medical assistance pursuant to provisions of the Federal Social Security Act, as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health care shall include the following mental health and substance use disorder services:

(a) Mental health services provided by a county or a city.

(b) Mental health services provided in a community mental health service
 or in a community mental health center organized under the federal Community Mental Health Centers Act of 1963. No amount shall be paid for that portion of the total costs of care and services in a federally funded community mental health center which may be compensated by the United States government under the federal Community Mental Health Centers Act of 1963. No amount shall be paid to a community mental health service or a federally funded community mental health center unless the community mental health service or the federally funded community mental health center participates in a county or city mental health performance contract pursuant to Section 5650.

(c) Drug Medi-Cal outpatient substance use disorder services under the jurisdiction of the department provided by a county provider certified under this chapter or a private provider certified under this chapter which has an approved contract with the county or with the department to
 provide covered substance use disorder services.

(d) Inpatient hospital services in an institution for mental diseases to persons of all ages, provided that the institution for mental diseases is certified as a psychiatric hospital under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act and regulations issued thereunder.

Notwithstanding Section 14157, no money in the State Health Care Deposit Fund shall be expended for the purposes of this section unless the Legislature specifically appropriates money for the purposes of this section.

The amendment of this subdivision enacted at the 1972 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the preexisting law.

(e) (1) Other diagnostic, screening, preventive, or remedial rehabilitative
 services for the maximum restoration of an individual to the best possible functional level.

(2) Paragraph (1) includes any medical or remedial services provided in a facility, home, or other setting, that are recommended by a physician or other licensed practitioner of the healing arts within the scope of his or her practice under state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 72.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.2.

(a) The department shall develop a proposal for the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services for selection as a participating state in the time-limited demonstration program pursuant to Section 223 of the federal Protecting Access to Medicare Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-93) in order to improve mental health services furnished by certified community behavioral health clinics to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(b) The department shall use the funds appropriated in the act that added this section to pay any costs that will support the development of a competitive proposal, including, but not limited to, establishing actuarially sound rates and providing technical assistance to counties.

(c) If the state is selected as a participating state in the time-limited demonstration program described in subdivision (a),
 the department, by March 1, 2017, shall provide an update to the Legislature that includes, to the extent it is available, the following information:

(1) The names of the participating counties.

(2) The estimated amount of additional funding each county is expected to receive under the demonstration program.

(3) The proposed uses of the additional funds and the county funds no longer required to be used as the federal match.

(4) A description of the improved partnerships between certified community behavioral health clinics and veterans organizations, primary care providers, health plans, educational agencies, and other organizations that the demonstration program includes.

(5) Other identified benefits from the demonstration program funding and planning process, and recommendations on any components of the demonstration program that could be extended to other
 counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 283, Sec. 2.   (AB 168)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.3.

The state plan for medical assistance under Medicaid pursuant to Section 1915(g) of Title 19 of the federal Social Security Act, as amended by Public Law 99-272 (42
 U.S.C. Section 1396n(g)), shall include targeted case management services as a benefit under the specialty mental health services Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1385, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 222.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.30.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer to the State Department of Health Care Services, no later than July 1, 2012, the administration of the Drug Medi-Cal program from the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs. It is further the intent of the Legislature that this transfer should happen efficiently and effectively, with no unintended interruptions in
 service delivery. This transfer is intended to do all of the following:

(1) Improve access to alcohol and drug treatment services, including a focus on recovery and rehabilitation services.

(2) More effectively integrate the financing of services, including the receipt of federal funds.

(3) Improve state accountability and outcomes.

(4) Provide focused, high-level leadership for behavioral health services.

(b) Effective July 1, 2012, the administrative functions for the Drug Medi-Cal program that were previously performed by the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs are transferred to the department.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the department and the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs may conduct transition activities prior to July 1, 2012, that are necessary to ensure the efficient and effective transfer of Drug Medi-Cal program functions by that date in accordance with the transition plan described in Section 14021.31.

(d) After July 1, 2012, and through the quarter ending June 30, 2014, the department shall provide quarterly updates to the Legislature, key stakeholders, and the public on the steps foreseen, planned, and completed for the Drug Medi-Cal transfer, noting areas of concern, delay, or disruption, as the program fully transitions to the State Department of Health Care Services. These updates shall include information on continuity of care for beneficiaries and any access issues to care that arise as a result of or within the Drug Medi-Cal transfer. The State Department of Health Care Services
 shall convene meetings with interested stakeholders, including legislative representatives, either in preparation for or at the release of these quarterly updates. The first of these quarterly updates shall be released no later than October 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 36, Sec. 73.   (SB 1014)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.31.

The department, in collaboration with the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs, shall develop an administrative and programmatic transition plan to guide the transfer of the Drug Medi-Cal program to the department effective July 1, 2012.

(a) Commencing no later than July 15, 2011, the department, together with the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs, shall convene stakeholders to receive input from consumers, family members, providers, counties, and representatives of the Legislature concerning the transfer of the administration of Drug Medi-Cal functions currently performed by the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs to the department. This consultation shall inform the creation of an administrative and programmatic transition plan that shall include, but
 is not limited to, the following components:

(1) Plans for how to review monthly billing from counties to monitor and prevent any disruptions of service to Drug Medi-Cal beneficiaries during and immediately after the transition, and a description of how the department intends to approach the longer-term development of measures for access and quality of service.

(2) A detailed description of the Drug Medi-Cal administrative functions currently performed by the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs.

(3) Explanations of the operational steps, timelines, and key milestones for determining when and how each of these functions will be transferred. These explanations shall also be developed for the transition of position and staff serving the Drug Medi-Cal program and how these will relate to and align with